Connecticut, session 2026, HB05050.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to increase to
more than seventy-five thousand dollars the sales price threshold for a
motor vehicle subject to the seven and three-fourths per cent sales and
use taxes rate.